analysis-filter.xfst
!
! Replace / delete the special symbols used in the lexicon from the analysis
! side.
!
define intSym @"intermediate-symbols.a";
define cons @"consonant.a";
define Cons [cons|⟪c⟫|⟪p⟫|⟪t⟫|⟪k⟫|⟪g⟫];

regex  ⟪IGB⟫ -> 0
,,     ⟪c⟫ -> ç,
       ⟪p⟫ -> p,
       ⟪t⟫ -> t,
       ⟪k⟫ -> k,
       ⟪g⟫ -> g || _ \[⟪dup⟫|⟪compn⟫]
,,     ⟪c⟫ -> c,
       ⟪p⟫ -> b,
       ⟪t⟫ -> d,
       ⟪k⟫ -> ğ,
       ⟪g⟫ -> ğ || _ ⟪compn⟫
    ,,  ˈ -> 0
    ,, [⟪sBRV⟫|⟪sBUV⟫|⟪sFRV⟫|⟪sFUV⟫|⟪sUC⟫|⟪sVC⟫] -> 0
    ,, ? -> 0 || _ ⟪dup⟫
    ,, ⟪dup⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪del⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪dels⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪prn⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪tSep⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪dSep⟫ -> %,
    ,, ⟪DB⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪mredup⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪pers⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪part⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪compn⟫ -> i || [i|e] Cons+ intSym* _
    ,, ⟪compn⟫ -> ı || [ı|a] Cons+ intSym* _
    ,, ⟪compn⟫ -> ü || [ü|ö] Cons+ intSym* _
    ,, ⟪compn⟫ -> u || [u|o] Cons+ intSym* _
    ,, ⟪compn⟫ -> s i || [i|e] intSym* _
    ,, ⟪compn⟫ -> s ı || [ı|a] intSym* _
    ,, ⟪compn⟫ -> s ü || [ü|ö] intSym* _
    ,, ⟪compn⟫ -> s u || [u|o] intSym* _
    ,, [..] -> ⟨1s⟩ || ⟪1s⟫ intSym* ⟨Pron⟩ _
    ,, [..] -> ⟨2s⟩ || ⟪2s⟫ intSym* ⟨Pron⟩ _
    ,, [..] -> ⟨3s⟩ || ⟪3s⟫ intSym* ⟨Pron⟩ _
    ,, [..] -> ⟨1p⟩ || ⟪1p⟫ intSym* ⟨Pron⟩ _
    ,, [..] -> ⟨2p⟩ || ⟪2p⟫ intSym* ⟨Pron⟩ _
    ,, [..] -> ⟨3p⟩ || ⟪3p⟫ intSym* ⟨Pron⟩ _
    ,, [⟪1s⟫|⟪2s⟫|⟪3s⟫|⟪1p⟫|⟪2p⟫|⟪3p⟫] -> 0
! noun subcategorization
    ,, [..] -> ⟨prop⟩ || ⟪propn⟫ intSym* ⟨N⟩ _
    ,, ⟪propn⟫ -> 0
   .o. [..] -> ⟨abbr⟩ || ⟪abbr⟫ intSym* ⟨N⟩ _
    ,, ⟪abbr⟫ -> 0
! determiner subcategorization
    ,, ⟨Det⟩ -> ⟨Det⟩ ⟨indef⟩ || ⟪indef⟫ intSym* _
    ,, ⟨Det⟩ -> ⟨Det⟩ ⟨def⟩ || ⟪def⟫ intSym* _
! conjunction subcategorization
    ,, ⟨Cnj⟩ -> ⟨Cnj⟩ ⟨coo⟩ || ⟪coo⟫ intSym* _
    ,, ⟨Cnj⟩ -> ⟨Cnj⟩ ⟨adv⟩ || ⟪adv⟫ intSym* _
    ,, ⟨Cnj⟩ -> ⟨Cnj⟩ ⟨sub⟩ || ⟪sub⟫ intSym* _
    ,, [⟪adv⟫|⟪coo⟫|⟪sub⟫] -> 0
    ,, ⟪time⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟨opt⟩ -> ⟨cond⟩ || _ ?+ [⟨1s⟩|⟨2s⟩|⟨3s⟩|⟨1p⟩|⟨2p⟩|⟨3p⟩],
                         _ [⟨1s⟩|⟨2s⟩|⟨3s⟩|⟨1p⟩|⟨2p⟩|⟨3p⟩] ?+
    ,, intSym -> 0
;
